src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  b a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  b a d ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  a m %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  b e c o m i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  a m %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  a %  p o l i c e m a n %  s o l d i e r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  b e c o m e %  a %  [ p o l i c e m a n | s o l d i e r ] ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e c o m e %  a %  d o c t o r ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  c h i e f "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  b e c a m e %  c h i e f ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg2" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjPl2" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjX" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ b e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  d o ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  [ h e | s h e ] %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  w e %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  a l l %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  t h e y %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  s o m e o n e %  [ b e c a m e | t h a t ] %  i s %  w h a t %  I %  d i d ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  b e c o m e s %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e c o m e %  l i k e %  t h a t "+V" "+I" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  b e c o m e s %  l i k e %  t h a t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e %  d o "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  I %  [ b e c o m e | d o ] %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ t h a t %  b e %  h o w %  b e c o m e %  d o "+V" "+T" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h a t %  i s %  h o w %  y o u %  [ b e c o m e | d o ] %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
